District of Columbia statutes.
1-613.53

Transition provisions.

(a)

Until regulations are issued by the Mayor, the Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia to implement the provisions of this subchapter for their respective employees, the performance evaluation systems in effect on June 10, 1998, shall continue in effect.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or of any collective bargaining agreement, the implementation of the performance management system established in this subchapter is a non-negotiable subject for collective bargaining.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1353
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(p), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-614.53.
Applicability of § 101(p) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-613.51.